Utah statutes.
19-6-603.   Collection for recycling.

(1)  A person selling lead acid batteries at retail shall at the point of sale accept a customer's used lead acid battery and a maximum of one additional used lead acid battery when the customer purchases a new lead acid battery.

(2)  A person selling lead acid batteries at wholesale shall at the point of sale accept a customer's used lead acid batteries.

(3) (a)  A person selling lead acid batteries at retail shall post on the premises a clearly legible notice that is at least 8 1/2 inches by 11 inches in size and visible to customers that states: "It is illegal under state law to discard a motor vehicle battery or other lead acid battery. You must recycle your used battery. State law requires us to accept up to two of your used lead acid batteries for recycling when you purchase a new lead acid battery.

"You may take lead acid batteries for recycling to (the retailer shall insert the name and address of at least one facility under Subsection 19-6-602(1)(b), (c), or (d) that is near the retailer)."

(b)  A person selling lead acid batteries wholesale shall post on the premises a clearly legible notice that is at least 8 1/2 inches by 11 inches in size and visible to customers that states:

"It is illegal under state law to discard a motor vehicle battery or other lead acid battery. You must recycle your used battery. State law requires us to accept your used lead acid battery for recycling, including when you purchase a new lead acid battery."

(4)  Lead acid batteries that a lead acid battery retailer is not required to accept under this section shall be disposed of only at facilities listed under Subsections 19-6-602(1)(b), (c), or (d).



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 112, 1991 General Session 

Enacted by Chapter 122, 1991 General Session

